Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.64.020

Conversion to public trust company.

A private trust or private trust company which seeks to convert to one transacting business with the general public in this state must apply for and obtain a certificate of authority as a state trust company under chapter 30B.08 RCW or a federal charter or charter from another state which would permit it to conduct trust business and fiduciary activities in this state without engaging in unauthorized trust activity.

[ 2014 c 37 s 399.]